Colorado, session 2026A, SB028.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
Shading denotes HOUSE amendment. Double underlining denotes SENATE amendment.
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material to be added to existing law.
Dashes through the words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law.

SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-2-124, amend
(1)(a)(VII) as follows:
40-2-124. Renewable energy standards - qualifying retail and
wholesale utilities - definitions - net metering - legislative declaration
- rules.
(1) Each provider of retail electric service in the state of Colorado,
other than municipally owned utilities that serve forty thousand customers
or fewer, is a qualifying retail utility. Each qualifying retail utility, with
the exception of cooperative electric associations that have voted to
exempt themselves from commission jurisdiction pursuant to section
40-9.5-104 and municipally owned utilities, is subject to the rules
established under this article 2 by the commission. No additional
regulatory authority is provided to the commission other than that
specifically contained in this section. In accordance with article 4 of title
24, the commission shall revise or clarify existing rules to establish the
following:
(a) Definitions of eligible energy resources that can be used to
meet the standards. "Eligible energy resources" means recycled energy,
renewable energy resources, and renewable energy storage. In addition,
resources using coal mine methane and synthetic gas produced by
pyrolysis of waste materials are eligible energy resources if the
commission determines that the electricity generated by those resources
is greenhouse gas neutral. The commission shall determine, following an
evidentiary hearing, the extent to which such electric generation
technologies utilized in an optional pricing program may be used to
comply with this standard. A fuel cell using hydrogen derived from an
eligible energy resource is also an eligible electric generation technology.
-2- SB26-028

Fossil and nuclear fuels and their derivatives are not eligible energy
resources. As used in this section:
(VII) "Renewable energy resources" means solar, wind,
geothermal, biomass that is greenhouse gas neutral, new hydroelectricity
with a nameplate rating of ten megawatts or less, and hydroelectricity in
existence on January 1, 2005, with a nameplate rating of thirty megawatts
or less and that does not require the construction of any new dams or
reservoirs. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection
(1)(a)(VII), a biomass electric generation facility that was in existence on
or before January 1, 2021, or that has a nameplate rating of ten megawatts
or less, shall be considered a renewable energy resource.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-2-125.5, add
(2)(b)(III) as follows:
40-2-125.5. Carbon dioxide emission reductions - goal to
eliminate by 2050 - legislative declaration - interim targets -
submission and approval of plans - definitions - cost recovery -
reports - rules.
(2) Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(b) (III) "CLEAN ENERGY RESOURCE" DOES NOT INCLUDE WIND
ENERGY.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
-3- SB26-028

or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to clean energy plans filed and renewable
energy credits applied for on or after the applicable effective date of this
act.
-4- SB26-028